Utah statutes.
59-7-111.   Safe harbor lease provisions.

(1) (a)  For purchasers or lessors of safe harbor leases, the following additions shall be made to unadjusted income:

(i)  interest expense; and

(ii)  depreciation claimed on safe harbor lease property.

(b)  For purchasers or lessors of safe harbor leases, the following subtractions shall be made from unadjusted income:

(i)  rental income; and

(ii)  amortization of the purchase price of tax benefits.

(2) (a)  For sellers or lessees of safe harbor leases the following additions shall be made from unadjusted income:

(i)  the amount of gain on the sale of federal tax benefits; and

(ii)  rental expense on safe harbor lease property.

(b)  For sellers or lessees of safe harbor leases the following subtractions shall be made to unadjusted income:

(i)  interest income; and

(ii)  depreciation on safe harbor lease property.

